Utah statutes.
49-21-104.   Creation of trust fund.
(1)  There is created the "Public Employees' Long-Term Disability Trust Fund"
for the purpose of paying the benefits and costs of administering this
program.
(2)  The fund shall consist of all money and interest paid into it in
accordance with this chapter, whether in the form of cash, securities, or
other assets, and of all money received from any other source.
(3)  Custody, management, and investment of the fund shall be governed by
Chapter 11, Utah State Retirement Systems Administration.
